Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB666.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1511.2. Learning Loss Plans.--(a) By July 1, 2026, the department shall develop and distribute to school entities model guidelines and best practices that school entities shall implement upon the occurrence of learning loss triggering events. The model guidelines and best practices shall include in-person instruction, rather than remote or asynchronous instruction, as well as options for the following:(1) Tutoring.(2) Extended instructional days.1234567891011121314151617181920 (3) Additional instructional days.(4) Any other remedial measure deemed necessary by the department.(b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, upon the occurrence of a learning loss triggering event, an affected school entity shall submit to the department a remediation plan that includes enhanced instruction for a number of days equal to the number of days affected by the learning loss triggering event, or until the end of the academic year, whichever is shorter. The plan shall include components of the model guidelines and best practices established under subsection (a).(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Learning loss triggering event" shall mean an anomalous event that materially disrupts the educational environment and requires a school entity closure or remote instruction for five (5) or more instructional days. The term includes an occurrence of a pandemic, natural disaster or employe strike."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate unit, charter school, regional charter school or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0666PN0673 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425